District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-510

Rights of limited partner.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 657, Pub. L. 87-716, § 10
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-210.
1973 Ed., § 41-410.